Wisconsin, session 2025, SB945.
do enact as follows:SB945,13Section 1. 175.36 of the statutes is created to read:SB945,2,24175.36 Storage of firearms by retail entity. Any person who engages in 5the retail commercial sale or transfer of firearms shall ensure, when the place of 1business is unattended, that each firearm that is located in the place of business is 2secured using one of the following methods:SB945,2,43(1) The firearm is stored in a locked fireproof safe, in a locked steel gun 4cabinet, or in a vault in the business premises.SB945,2,135(2) The firearm is stored in a display case that is made with a steel frame that 6is no thinner than 12 gauge, is fitted with a hardened steel lock where the case 7opens to access the firearm, and is fitted either with smash-proof polycarbonate 8panels that are at least one-quarter inch thick or with glass that is protected with a 9security or protective laminate film that is specifically designed to delay entry and 10unauthorized access, with a minimum thickness of at least eight-thousandths of an 11inch, and that includes an anchoring system on all seams of each glass panel and is 12also anchored to the frame. If the location of the retail store is at street level, one of 13the following is also required:SB945,2,1714(a) Concrete or hardened steel bollards, or other barriers such as security 15planters or other devices with a similar structural integrity of bollards, that protect 16the location’s front entrance, any floor-to-ceiling windows, and any other doors that 17could be breached by a vehicle.SB945,2,2018(b) Locking steel roll-down doors that are installed on all perimeter doors and 19floor-to-ceiling windows, unless the installation would violate a state or local fire 20code.SB945,3,421(3) The firearm is secured with a hardened steel rod or cable of at least one-22eighth inch in diameter through the trigger guard of the firearm. The steel rod or 23cable shall be secured with a hardened steel lock that has a shackle. The lock and 1shackle shall be protected or shielded from the use of a bolt cutter, and the rod or 2cable shall be anchored in a manner that prevents the removal of the firearm from 3the premises. If the location of the retail store is at street level, one of the following 4is also required:SB945,3,85(a) Concrete or hardened steel bollards, or other barriers such as security 6planters or other devices with a similar structural integrity of bollards, that protect 7the location’s front entrance, any floor-to-ceiling windows, and any other doors that 8could be breached by a vehicle.SB945,3,119(b) Locking steel roll-down doors that are installed on all perimeter doors and 10floor-to-ceiling windows, unless the installation would violate a state or local fire 11code.SB945,3,1412(4) The firearm is stored in a windowless room that is equipped with a steel 13security door fitted with a deadbolt lock and that does not have a door exposed to 14the outside of the building.SB945,3,1615(5) The firearm is stored behind a steel roll-down door or security gate, or the 16firearm is secured in a locked steel gun rack by use of a hardened steel bar.SB945,3,1717